Maryland, session 2026, SB0772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
2–111.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A PROCESS THROUGH WHICH A PERSON MAY
RECOMMEND A VOCATIONAL, WORKFORCE, TRAINING, OR JOB PLACEMENT
PROGRAM FOR INCLUSION IN THE DATABASE DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED UNDER
§ 15–160 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(2) IF APPROPRIATE, FORWARD A RECOMMENDATION MADE UNDER
ITEM (1) OF THIS SECTION TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR
INCLUSION IN THE DATABASE.
Article – Health – General
15–160.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DATABASE” MEANS THE EMPLOYMENT TRAINING
AND OPPORTUNITY DATABASE DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 166
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN AN
EMPLOYMENT TRAINING AND OPPORTUNITY DATABASE.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE DATABASE IS TO PROVIDE INDIVIDUALS IN
THE STATE WITH ASSISTANCE IN FINDING EMPLOYMENT TRAINING AND OTHER
OPPORTUNITIES THAT MAY ENABLE THE INDIVIDUALS TO BECOME ELIGIBLE AND
MAINTAIN ELIGIBILITY FOR:
(I) THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(3) IN DEVELOPING AND MAINTAINING THE DATABASE, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE FOLLOWING ENTITIES:
(I) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR;
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES;
(III) THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICE AND CIVIC INNOVATION;
(IV) THE MARYLAND CHAMBER OF COMMERCE;
(V) LABOR UNIONS;
(VI) TRADE ASSOCIATIONS;
(VII) EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS;
(VIII) LOCAL WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARDS; AND
(IX) ANY OTHER ENTITY THAT THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES
APPROPRIATE.
(C) THE DATABASE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) VOCATIONAL, WORKFORCE TRAINING, AND JOB PLACEMENT
PROGRAMS AVAILABLE IN THE STATE;
(2) INFORMATION REGARDING HOW TO APPLY FOR A VOCATIONAL,
WORKFORCE TRAINING, OR JOB PLACEMENT PROGRAM INCLUDED IN THE
DATABASE UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 166 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A MECHANISM THAT ALLOWS AN INDIVIDUAL TO DIRECTLY
CONTACT THE VOCATIONAL, WORKFORCE TRAINING, OR JOB PLACEMENT PROGRAM
IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS INTERESTED.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) MAKE THE DATABASE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ON A
DEDICATED PAGE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE;
(2) ASSIST INDIVIDUALS IN ENROLLING IN VOCATIONAL,
WORKFORCE TRAINING, AND JOB PLACEMENT PROGRAMS LISTED IN THE
DATABASE; AND
(3) UPDATE THE DATABASE AT LEAST EVERY 30 DAYS.
Article – Human Services
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Human Services.
5–304.
(b) (1) The Secretary of Budget and Management, with the assistance of the
Secretary, shall develop and implement a plan for hiring current and former recipients,
children of current or former recipients, foster youth, and obligors by the principal
departments within the Executive Branch of State government.
(c) (1) Working with appropriate local government officials, the Secretary and
each local director shall develop and implement a local government hiring plan under which
local governments may hire current and former recipients, children of current or former
recipients, foster youth, and obligors.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A PROCESS THROUGH WHICH A PERSON MAY
RECOMMEND A VOCATIONAL, WORKFORCE TRAINING, OR JOB PLACEMENT
PROGRAM FOR INCLUSION IN THE DATABASE DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED UNDER
§ 15–160 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 166
(2) IF APPROPRIATE, FORWARD A RECOMMENDATION MADE UNDER
ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR
INCLUSION IN THE DATABASE.
Article – State Government
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Department of Service and Civic Innovation.
21–106.
(b) The Department shall:
(7) conduct studies and make recommendations to improve volunteer
recruitment and training, volunteer retention, and accountability of volunteer programs;
[and]
(8) provide staff support for the Governor’s Commission on Service and
Volunteerism; AND
(9) (I) ESTABLISH A PROCESS THROUGH WHICH A PERSON MAY
RECOMMEND A VOCATIONAL, WORKFORCE TRAINING, OR JOB PLACEMENT
PROGRAM FOR INCLUSION IN THE DATABASE DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED UNDER
§ 15–160 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(II) IF APPROPRIATE, FORWARD A RECOMMENDATION MADE
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR
INCLUSION IN THE DATABASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 5 –